browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3888 Y 1
SFX 3888 0 tivais .
SFX 3598 Y 1
SFX 3598 0 agliadas .
SFX 1799 Y 1
SFX 1799 0 tschond .
SFX 2602 Y 1
SFX 2602 0 itura .
SFX 31 Y 1
SFX 31 0 ain .
SFX 3069 Y 1
SFX 3069 0 siva .
SFX 472 Y 1
SFX 472 0 air .
SFX 30 Y 1
SFX 30 0 ais .
SFX 2849 Y 1
SFX 2849 0 aiv .
SFX 4477 Y 1
SFX 4477 0 iturs .
SFX 2331 Y 1
SFX 2331 0 zzian .
SFX 2330 Y 1
SFX 2330 0 zzias .
SFX 2745 Y 1
SFX 2745 0 egiader .
SFX 4935 Y 1
SFX 4935 0 bilisà .
SFX 1965 Y 1
SFX 1965 0 alistic .
SFX 3513 Y 1
SFX 3513 0 cedidas .
SFX 4488 Y 1
SFX 4488 0 itader .
SFX 461 Y 1
SFX 461 0 rada .
SFX 3374 Y 1
SFX 3374 0 fitgain .
SFX 3373 Y 1
SFX 3373 0 fitgais .
SFX 681 Y 1
SFX 681 0 rads .
SFX 1205 Y 1
SFX 1205 0 urai .
SFX 1204 Y 1
SFX 1204 0 urar .
SFX 3730 Y 1
SFX 3730 0 unalisada .
SFX 671 Y 1
SFX 671 0 uras .
SFX 2990 Y 1
SFX 2990 0 tinia .
SFX 3728 Y 1
SFX 3728 0 unalisads .
SFX 2354 Y 1
SFX 2354 0 vegnind .
SFX 1952 Y 1
SFX 1952 0 arisava .
SFX 146 Y 1
SFX 146 0 ala .
SFX 3188 Y 1
SFX 3188 0 naria .
SFX 217 Y 1
SFX 217 0 als .
SFX 913 Y 1
SFX 913 0 ibla .
SFX 3938 Y 1
SFX 3938 0 tgera .
SFX 4723 Y 1
SFX 4723 0 estada .
SFX 1275 Y 1
SFX 1275 0 isabel .
SFX 3430 Y 1
SFX 3430 0 egliass .
SFX 4248 Y 1
SFX 4248 0 orisavan .
SFX 4247 Y 1
SFX 4247 0 orisavas .
SFX 1373 Y 1
SFX 1373 0 iglià .
SFX 802 Y 1
SFX 802 0 ana .
SFX 3568 Y 1
SFX 3568 0 and .
SFX 1100 Y 1
SFX 1100 0 ani .
SFX 1766 Y 1
SFX 1766 0 ans .
SFX 80 Y 1
SFX 80 0 ant .
SFX 2734 Y 1
SFX 2734 0 enas .
SFX 538 Y 1
SFX 538 0 cà .
SFX 1716 Y 1
SFX 1716 0 idà .
SFX 3427 Y 1
SFX 3427 0 egliava .
SFX 654 Y 1
SFX 654 0 rain .
SFX 653 Y 1
SFX 653 0 rais .
SFX 1796 Y 1
SFX 1796 0 ualmain .
SFX 3726 Y 1
SFX 3726 0 unalisain .
SFX 3725 Y 1
SFX 3725 0 unalisais .
SFX 2352 Y 1
SFX 2352 0 vegniss .
SFX 4428 Y 1
SFX 4428 0 linà .
SFX 3049 Y 1
SFX 3049 0 stavan .
SFX 1741 Y 1
SFX 1741 0 giavan .
SFX 3048 Y 1
SFX 3048 0 stavas .
SFX 1740 Y 1
SFX 1740 0 giavas .
SFX 2733 Y 1
SFX 2733 0 enda .
SFX 3413 Y 1
SFX 3413 0 endi .
SFX 4852 Y 1
SFX 4852 0 currind .
SFX 4615 Y 1
SFX 4615 0 icist .
SFX 1098 Y 1
SFX 1098 0 blas .
SFX 247 Y 1
SFX 247 0 ara .
SFX 1964 Y 1
SFX 1964 0 ard .
SFX 224 Y 1
SFX 224 0 ari .
SFX 2960 Y 1
SFX 2960 0 turada .
SFX 670 Y 1
SFX 670 0 ars .
SFX 2958 Y 1
SFX 2958 0 turads .
SFX 3108 Y 1
SFX 3108 0 rala .
SFX 2646 Y 1
SFX 2646 0 ignass .
SFX 3884 Y 1
SFX 3884 0 tivass .
SFX 3043 Y 1
SFX 3043 0 stituziun .
SFX 36 Y 1
SFX 36 0 ass .
SFX 2817 Y 1
SFX 2817 0 ast .
SFX 2029 Y 1
SFX 2029 0 uria .
SFX 4849 Y 1
SFX 4849 0 currissan .
SFX 2197 Y 1
SFX 2197 0 itgada .
SFX 4848 Y 1
SFX 4848 0 currissas .
SFX 3671 Y 1
SFX 3671 0 uplescha .
SFX 4833 Y 1
SFX 4833 0 dicat .
SFX 2195 Y 1
SFX 2195 0 itgads .
SFX 2349 Y 1
SFX 2349 0 vegniva .
SFX 3582 Y 1
SFX 3582 0 aleschas .
SFX 1099 Y 1
SFX 1099 0 ata .
SFX 1940 Y 1
SFX 1940 0 atg .
SFX 926 Y 1
SFX 926 0 ats .
SFX 4676 Y 1
SFX 4676 0 gettas .
SFX 4783 Y 1
SFX 4783 0 electrica .
SFX 3455 Y 1
SFX 3455 0 detgna .
SFX 1314 Y 1
SFX 1314 0 urond .
SFX 2993 Y 1
SFX 2993 0 tifitgada .
SFX 3925 Y 1
SFX 3925 0 tifitgads .
SFX 3371 Y 1
SFX 3371 0 fitgass .
SFX 1837 Y 1
SFX 1837 0 rant .
SFX 925 Y 1
SFX 925 0 aun .
SFX 3076 Y 1
SFX 3076 0 scola .
SFX 3556 Y 1
SFX 3556 0 aticas .
SFX 2643 Y 1
SFX 2643 0 ignava .
SFX 3881 Y 1
SFX 3881 0 tivava .
SFX 37 Y 1
SFX 37 0 ava .
SFX 3199 Y 1
SFX 3199 0 minavan .
SFX 4958 Y 1
SFX 4958 0 avi .
SFX 3198 Y 1
SFX 3198 0 minavas .
SFX 4457 Y 1
SFX 4457 0 ladira .
SFX 4850 Y 1
SFX 4850 0 curriss .
SFX 2656 Y 1
SFX 2656 0 ieras .
SFX 4965 Y 1
SFX 4965 0 atlon .
SFX 479 Y 1
SFX 479 0 pai .
SFX 546 Y 1
SFX 546 0 pan .
SFX 444 Y 1
SFX 444 0 par .
SFX 406 Y 1
SFX 406 0 pas .
SFX 2956 Y 1
SFX 2956 0 turain .
SFX 2955 Y 1
SFX 2955 0 turais .
SFX 87 Y 1
SFX 87 0 ment .
SFX 3368 Y 1
SFX 3368 0 fitgava .
SFX 3789 Y 1
SFX 3789 0 tunavan .
SFX 3788 Y 1
SFX 3788 0 tunavas .
SFX 2193 Y 1
SFX 2193 0 itgain .
SFX 4426 Y 1
SFX 4426 0 linadas .
SFX 1677 Y 1
SFX 1677 0 itgais .
SFX 4487 Y 1
SFX 4487 0 itaivel .
SFX 3249 Y 1
SFX 3249 0 itgescha .
SFX 4847 Y 1
SFX 4847 0 curriva .
SFX 3923 Y 1
SFX 3923 0 tifitgain .
SFX 3922 Y 1
SFX 3922 0 tifitgais .
SFX 652 Y 1
SFX 652 0 rass .
SFX 3723 Y 1
SFX 3723 0 unalisass .
SFX 3566 Y 1
SFX 3566 0 anond .
SFX 3234 Y 1
SFX 3234 0 landa .
SFX 4759 Y 1
SFX 4759 0 enna .
SFX 2536 Y 1
SFX 2536 0 pel .
SFX 1044 Y 1
SFX 1044 0 per .
SFX 4228 Y 1
SFX 4228 0 pes .
SFX 1841 Y 1
SFX 1841 0 pet .
SFX 4721 Y 1
SFX 4721 0 estass .
SFX 391 Y 1
SFX 391 0 hian .
SFX 408 Y 1
SFX 408 0 hias .
SFX 2172 Y 1
SFX 2172 0 mess .
SFX 4904 Y 1
SFX 4904 0 centric .
SFX 651 Y 1
SFX 651 0 rava .
SFX 4761 Y 1
SFX 4761 0 endian .
SFX 4760 Y 1
SFX 4760 0 endias .
SFX 4542 Y 1
SFX 4542 0 imeschian .
SFX 4541 Y 1
SFX 4541 0 imeschias .
SFX 628 Y 1
SFX 628 0 chond .
SFX 3720 Y 1
SFX 3720 0 unalisava .
SFX 2303 Y 1
SFX 2303 0 egnian .
SFX 2302 Y 1
SFX 2302 0 egnias .
SFX 1758 Y 1
SFX 1758 0 ecziun .
SFX 4720 Y 1
SFX 4720 0 estava .
SFX 3046 Y 1
SFX 3046 0 sters .
SFX 545 Y 1
SFX 545 0 pia .
SFX 1349 Y 1
SFX 1349 0 pin .
SFX 3118 Y 1
SFX 3118 0 pir .
SFX 2027 Y 1
SFX 2027 0 urus .
SFX 4690 Y 1
SFX 4690 0 fecziun .
SFX 910 Y 1
SFX 910 0 iglia .
SFX 4822 Y 1
SFX 4822 0 ducziun .
SFX 1361 Y 1
SFX 1361 0 mesch .
SFX 3956 Y 1
SFX 3956 0 tegiassan .
SFX 3955 Y 1
SFX 3955 0 tegiassas .
SFX 4631 Y 1
SFX 4631 0 hettavan .
SFX 3697 Y 1
SFX 3697 0 unera .
SFX 4921 Y 1
SFX 4921 0 bilisesch .
SFX 4630 Y 1
SFX 4630 0 hettavas .
SFX 195 Y 1
SFX 195 0 enta .
SFX 4789 Y 1
SFX 4789 0 egnavan .
SFX 3463 Y 1
SFX 3463 0 ctur .
SFX 600 Y 1
SFX 600 0 ents .
SFX 4788 Y 1
SFX 4788 0 egnavas .
SFX 3364 Y 1
SFX 3364 0 fitgescha .
SFX 2953 Y 1
SFX 2953 0 turass .
SFX 4645 Y 1
SFX 4645 0 grams .
SFX 4942 Y 1
SFX 4942 0 bescha .
SFX 2191 Y 1
SFX 2191 0 itgass .
SFX 1763 Y 1
SFX 1763 0 azia .
SFX 4546 Y 1
SFX 4546 0 imescha .
SFX 3920 Y 1
SFX 3920 0 tifitgass .
SFX 2950 Y 1
SFX 2950 0 turava .
SFX 3127 Y 1
SFX 3127 0 onda .
SFX 637 Y 1
SFX 637 0 rà .
SFX 132 Y 1
SFX 132 0 adad .
SFX 2188 Y 1
SFX 2188 0 itgava .
SFX 1256 Y 1
SFX 1256 0 rì .
SFX 43 Y 1
SFX 43 0 adas .
SFX 110 Y 1
SFX 110 0 isà .
SFX 1569 Y 1
SFX 1569 0 chidas .
SFX 2651 Y 1
SFX 2651 0 ignà .
SFX 1636 Y 1
SFX 1636 0 ppa .
SFX 4038 Y 1
SFX 4038 0 silvan .
SFX 3689 Y 1
SFX 3689 0 untar .
SFX 3917 Y 1
SFX 3917 0 tifitgava .
SFX 313 Y 1
SFX 313 0 enza .
SFX 68 Y 1
SFX 68 0 aziun .
SFX 2516 Y 1
SFX 2516 0 pra .
SFX 1525 Y 1
SFX 1525 0 iunada .
SFX 1524 Y 1
SFX 1524 0 iunads .
SFX 1239 Y 1
SFX 1239 0 tezza .
SFX 4273 Y 1
SFX 4273 0 onia .
SFX 70 Y 1
SFX 70 0 ader .
SFX 4271 Y 1
SFX 4271 0 onic .
SFX 1183 Y 1
SFX 1183 0 diras .
SFX 4270 Y 1
SFX 4270 0 onim .
SFX 2637 Y 1
SFX 2637 0 ilada .
SFX 3296 Y 1
SFX 3296 0 ilads .
SFX 1961 Y 1
SFX 1961 0 arisadas .
SFX 4587 Y 1
SFX 4587 0 iffà .
SFX 4451 Y 1
SFX 4451 0 lanta .
SFX 3446 Y 1
SFX 3446 0 duct .
SFX 434 Y 1
SFX 434 0 schai .
SFX 476 Y 1
SFX 476 0 schan .
SFX 777 Y 1
SFX 777 0 schar .
SFX 1467 Y 1
SFX 1467 0 pun .
SFX 403 Y 1
SFX 403 0 schas .
SFX 1838 Y 1
SFX 1838 0 pus .
SFX 1266 Y 1
SFX 1266 0 neschan .
SFX 1265 Y 1
SFX 1265 0 neschas .
SFX 3570 Y 1
SFX 3570 0 anavan .
SFX 3569 Y 1
SFX 3569 0 anavas .
SFX 4193 Y 1
SFX 4193 0 provediment .
SFX 2800 Y 1
SFX 2800 0 atiseschan .
SFX 2799 Y 1
SFX 2799 0 atiseschas .
SFX 3516 Y 1
SFX 3516 0 cedian .
SFX 1618 Y 1
SFX 1618 0 riseschan .
SFX 3515 Y 1
SFX 3515 0 cedias .
SFX 1617 Y 1
SFX 1617 0 riseschas .
SFX 1523 Y 1
SFX 1523 0 iunain .
SFX 1522 Y 1
SFX 1522 0 iunais .
SFX 2329 Y 1
SFX 2329 0 adis .
SFX 2923 Y 1
SFX 2923 0 ularitad .
SFX 2671 Y 1
SFX 2671 0 hist .
SFX 4905 Y 1
SFX 4905 0 capacitad .
SFX 3294 Y 1
SFX 3294 0 ilain .
SFX 4708 Y 1
SFX 4708 0 eticas .
SFX 2636 Y 1
SFX 2636 0 ilais .
SFX 2108 Y 1
SFX 2108 0 schel .
SFX 3079 Y 1
SFX 3079 0 schen .
SFX 1611 Y 1
SFX 1611 0 scher .
SFX 2472 Y 1
SFX 2472 0 schet .
SFX 2851 Y 1
SFX 2851 0 adads .
SFX 879 Y 1
SFX 879 0 atscha .
SFX 3514 Y 1
SFX 3514 0 cedida .
SFX 2600 Y 1
SFX 2600 0 iunala .
SFX 3512 Y 1
SFX 3512 0 cedids .
SFX 717 Y 1
SFX 717 0 ifitgai .
SFX 4473 Y 1
SFX 4473 0 iunals .
