browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.dic
aut/1,3,5,57,81,83,88,95,162,181,183,192,244,248,339,361,400,671,1045,1262,1301,1476,1477,2139,2142,2204,2540,2846,3126,3136,4238,4239,4240,4241,4242,4243,4244,4245,4246,4247,4248,4249,4250,4251,4252,4253,4254,4255,4256,4257,4258,4259,4260
cap/83,140,154,183,243,244,249,265,326,368,928,1027,2025,2942,3438,3603,3870,3878,3879,3880,3881,3882,3883,3884,3885,3888,3889,3891,3892,3893,3894,3895
det/1,60,164,173,175,181,363,570,649,664,673,701,737,738,762,763,764,765,766,767,768,769,770,771,772,784,992,1758,1771,2328,2416,3441,3598,4712,4720,4721,4722,4723,4724,4757,4802,4804
diplom/1,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,68,177,880,926,1408,1763,3555,3556,3568
fat/5,60,78,82,310,363,366,664,734,784,1026,1241,1965
fres/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,70,327,359,571,807,1760,1818,1819,2076,2077,2078,3938,3943
gen/1,6,9,54,56,60,82,98,138,140,142,150,157,158,159,160,161,163,164,165,166,167,168,169,170,171,173,175,450,1131,1138,1368,1527,1793,2074,3254,4477,4708
lav/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,68,70,141,143,154,181,188,191,192,337,400,539,671,672,741,986,1204,1205,1314,1315,1316,1317,1318,1319,1320,1321,1322,1323,1324,1325,1326,1409,1767,1928,2027,2029,3547,3604,3658,3661,4537
minim/3,5,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,78,106,109,110,113,114,115,116,117,118,119,120,121,122,123,124,125,126,127,128,129,130,131,134,146,217,252,292,456,495,496,497,498,499,500,501,502,503,504,505,506,507,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,515,569,645,734,880,1026
paster/1483,3188
pen/15,105,310,372,627,913,926,1378,2301,2667,3746
perd/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,57,71,72,73,74,85,94,97,100,101,103,104,136,195,351,600,634,673,701,706,736,737,738,762,763,764,765,766,767,768,769,770,771,772,826,1204,1273,1327,1419,1420,1423,1751,2199,2903,3391,4461,4961
pin/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,60,235,516,1000,1428,1590,1591,1592,1799,1802,1803,1804,1805,1806,1807,1808,1811,2055,2056,3475
plat/626,647,802,853,1241,1339,2059,2079,3015
press/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,70,211,641,642,666,667,693,694,695,696,722,723,724,725,751,752,753,754,786,787,788,830,904,2745
proved/3,4,5,6,7,8,9,10,15,57,71,72,73,74,86,135,136,145,147,148,149,152,309,534,1527,2602,3341,4649,4650,4651,4653,4655
real/1,3,5,64,88,95,106,109,110,113,114,115,116,117,118,119,120,121,122,123,124,125,126,127,128,129,130,131,134,197,357,422,1200,1275,2606,4162,4531
rena/2947,2954,2958,2959,2961
renta/4914,4915,4916,4917,4918,4919,4920,4921,4922,4923,4924,4925,4926,4927,4928,4929,4930,4931,4932,4933,4934,4935
resta/1204,1205,1314,1315,1316,1317,1318,1319,1320,1321,1322,1323,1324,1325,1326,1412,1413,1414,1415,1416,1581,1582,2373,3661
reves/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,71,72,73,74,85,94,97,100,101,103,104,472,1817,1818,1819,2076,2077,2078,2403,2404,2408,2409,2998,2999,3000,3001,3002,3003,3004,3005,3006,3933,3934,3935
sai/2,12,14,55,83,244,352,363,461,517,682,1776,2878,2880,3444
sbuc/538
schlava/1970,1971,1972,1973,1974,1975,1976,1977,1978,1979,1980,1981,1982,1983,1984,1985,2330,2331,2332,2334
selvicultur/1,5,78,146
sfaud/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,910,965,1373,1543,1700,1701,1702,1703,1891,1892,1893,1894,1895,1896,1897,1898,1899,1900,2227
solid/247,535,1942,1950,1951,1952,1953,1954,1955,1956,1957,1958,1959,1960,1961,1962,1963,2322,3561,3562
Sudan/30
supporta/1098
surpass/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,70,80,141,153,199,315,1101
survegn/1,4,5,6,7,8,10,15,71,72,73,74,86,135,145,147,148,149,151,152,1100
temp/183,1663,1845,2297,2541,4263,4264,4712,4720,4721,4722,4723,4724
tuc/203,1766
und/3,5,35,43,143,461,618,637,651,652,653,654,655,676,677,678,679,680,681,682,696,830,2129
uni/1,2,11,12,13,14,16,17,18,19,22,24,61,144,150,160,161,203,235,368,393,759,939,1867,1868,2345,2413,2787,3231,3358,3359,3360,3361,3362,3363,3364,3365,3366,3367,3368,3369,3370,3371,3372,3373,3374,3375,3376,3377,3378,3379,3382,4677,4951
